District of Columbia statutes.
15-304

Return of writ.

If the return of a writ of execution is not made on or before the return day expressed in the writ it may nevertheless be made afterwards as of that date.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 525, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-304.
1973 Ed., § 15-304.